Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1634
Health department; funds; how disbursed.

(1) No funds shall be disbursed except upon vouchers approved by the director of health and the president of the board of health of a county or district health department. In the absence of the health director, the president and the vice president or, in his or her absence, the secretary are authorized to approve such vouchers before any funds are disbursed. In the absence of the president, the health director and the vice president or, in his or her absence, the secretary are authorized to approve such vouchers before any funds are disbursed. In the absence of both president and health director, the vice president and the secretary are authorized to approve such vouchers before any funds are disbursed.

(2) Funds of a city-county health department shall be disbursed as provided by the agreement between the county and the city.

Laws 1943, c. 152, § 9, p. 560;

R.S.1943, § 71-1634;

Laws 1953, c. 249, § 2, p. 853;

Laws 1967, c. 449, § 4, p. 1395;

Laws 1997, LB 185, § 6.